Hawaii statutes.
§291C-113 Ordinances regulating use of
vehicles for purposes of human habitation. Each of the counties may enact
and enforce ordinances regulating the use of vehicles for purposes of human
habitation.

Upon each of the counties enacting an ordinance
pertaining to the use of vehicles for purposes of human habitation, then so far
as that county is concerned, the ordinance shall have full force and effect,
and shall supersede section 291C-112 until the ordinance is repealed or
otherwise made invalid. [L 1972, c 48, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next